Hawaii statutes.
[§231-86] Violent interference with
a tax official. Any person who interferes, hinders, obstructs, prevents,
or impedes any investigator or employee of the department with violence or
threat of violence, shall be guilty of a class C felony and, upon conviction,
shall be subject to one or any combination of the following:

(1) A fine of not more than $4,000;

(2) Imprisonment for not more than three years; or

(3) Probation;

provided that a corporation shall be fined not less
than $10,000.

This section shall be construed in accordance
with regulations and judicial interpretations given to similar provisions of
the Internal Revenue Code. [L 2009, c 134, pt of §2, §13(3); am L 2013, c 58,
§1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next